Nevada, session 83, SB137.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division shall establish and operate a program to
improve:
(a) The ability of persons in this State to respond to medical
emergencies; and
(b) The access of persons in this State to resources for
responding to a medical emergency.
2. The program must:
(a) Assist volunteers in receiving training in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation, training through the Community Emergency
Response Team program of the Federal Emergency Management
Agency of the United States Department of Homeland Security or
similar training for responding to a medical emergency.
(b) Allow volunteers who are certified in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation by a nationally recognized organization to register to
authorize the Division to notify persons described in paragraph (c)
of the location of the volunteers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) Provide multiple means to notify a person who is
experiencing a medical emergency or assisting a person who is
experiencing a medical emergency of the location of volunteers
who have registered pursuant to paragraph (b), health facilities
and kits to provide first aid or stop the loss of blood. Such means
must include, without limitation, signage, applications for mobile
devices and access to information through quick response codes.
(d) Provide resources to assist communities in this State in
achieving the HEARTSafe Community designation, or any
successor designation, awarded by the Citizen CPR Foundation,
or its successor organization, and incentives to encourage
communities in this State to achieve that designation.
3. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the Division
may:
(a) Contract with or collaborate with any public or private
person or entity, including, without limitation:
(1) Providers of the training described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2;
(2) Federal, state and local governmental agencies;
(3) The Stop the Bleed program of the American College of
Surgeons, or any successor program;
(4) The American Heart Association, or its successor
organization;
(5) Providers of emergency medical services;
(6) Local emergency response organizations;
(7) Community health organizations;
(8) Homeowners’ associations;
(9) Insurers; and
(10) Health facilities and providers of health care.
(b) Establish one or more advisory committees.
(c) Apply for and accept gifts, grants and donations from any
source.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Health facility” means a facility in or through which
health services are provided.
(b) “Mobile device” includes, without limitation, a smartphone
or a tablet computer.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)